tasks/task1-2/rules-01.script
# rules-01.script
# Leonel Figueiredo de Alencar leonel.de.alencar@ufc.br
# August 22, 2022

clear
read lexc verbs-01.lexc
define Lexicon

# E Replacement: "e" of future indicative suffix "-re" changes to "á" before "s" or at word end (compra^^re^ => compra^^rá^)
define EReplacement e -> á || "^" r _ "^" [s | .#.] ;

# Nasalisation: "e" of future indicative suffixe changes to "ã" before word-final "m" (compra^^re^m => compra^^rã^m)
define Nasalisation e -> ã || "^" r _  "^" m .#.;

# M Replacement: "m" of 3rd person plural suffix changes to "o" before future indicative suffixe "rã" (compra^^rã^m => compra^^rã^o)
define MReplacement m -> o || ã "^" _ ;

# "^" Cleanup: deletion of morphem boundary symbol
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Grammar  Lexicon  .o.
                EReplacement .o.
                Nasalisation .o.
                MReplacement .o.
                Cleanup ;

regex Grammar ;
